Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 3 Powers of Banks

7-1-280.
Major banking powers.

Subject to restrictions contained in this chapter or in its articles, a bank shall have the power:

To receive money or commercial paper for deposit and to provide by its rules or by agreement for the terms of withdrawal and interest thereon;

To act as an agent to collect checks, drafts, and other items of commercial paper and in exercising this power to become a member of a clearing-house and grant security interests in its assets for its qualification therein;

To lend money and discount or purchase evidence of indebtedness and agreements for the payment of money and to take security title or security interests in real or personal property to secure obligations owing thereunder;

To service loans made by it or by others whether or not held by the bank;

To issue, advise, and confirm letters of credit authorizing the beneficiaries thereof to draw upon the bank or its correspondents;

To receive money for transmission;

To buy and sell exchange, coin, and bullion; and

To provide third-party payments services.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 17, § 1; Code 1933, § 13-1801; Code 1933, § 41A-1301, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 258, § 4; Ga. L. 1986, p. 458, § 5.

Cross references.

Definition of “clearing-house” for purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code, §

11-4-104

.

Definition of “collecting bank” for purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code, §

11-4-105

.

For provisions of T. 11, the Uniform Commercial Code, pertaining to letters of credit generally, §

11-5-101

et seq.

Effect of laws relating to regulation of practice of law on power of banks to give advice to customers in matters incidental to banks or banking, §

15-19-52

.

7-1-281.
Participation in federal programs.

Any bank may:

Become a member of the Federal Reserve System and conform to the rules and regulations of that system and the federal reserve bank of which it is a member;

Become an insured bank pursuant to the Federal Deposit Insurance Act and take all action necessary to the maintenance of insured status thereunder;

Apply for and obtain insurance on loans pursuant to national housing legislation.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, § 38; Code 1933, § 13-2038; Code 1933, § 41A-1302, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 17; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 7.

U.S. Code.

The Federal Deposit Insurance Act, referred to in paragraph (2) of this Code section, is codified as 12 U.S.C. §§ 1728, 1811 et seq.

7-1-282.
Direct leasing of personal and real property.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary and subject to such regulations as the department may prescribe, a bank may:

Become the owner and lessor of personal property acquired upon the specific request and for the use of a customer and may incur such additional obligations as may be incident to becoming an owner and lessor of such property. At the end of any lease, the bank shall, within six months, enter into a new lease with respect to the property or dispose of it. The leasing shall constitute an indebtedness under Code Section 7-1-285 and shall be subject to the lending limitations of such Code section;

Become the owner and lessor of certain public real property and facilities. A bank may purchase or construct a municipal building, school building, or other similar state, local, or other governmental authority facility if, as holder of legal title, such purchase is for the purpose of leasing the facility to a municipality or other public or governmental authority which has the authority to enter into such lease, is authorized to levy taxes or is backed by the taxing authority of another political subdivision, and has the resources sufficient to make lease payments as they come due. The lease agreement must provide that the lessee will become the owner of the building or facility upon the expiration of the lease; and

Become the owner and lessor of real property acquired upon the specific request and for the use of a customer or an affiliate thereof and may incur such additional obligations as may be incidental to becoming an owner and lessor of such property. The lessee, or an affiliate thereof, shall be responsible for any and all construction of buildings or other improvements related to such real property. Any lease with respect to such real property shall provide that the lessee thereof shall be responsible for maintaining the property, insuring the property, and paying real estate taxes related to the property. At the end of any lease, the bank shall, within six months, enter into a new lease with respect to the property or dispose of it. The leasing shall be subject to credit approval by the bank in a manner substantially similar to a loan and shall constitute an indebtedness under Code Section 7-1-285 and shall be subject to the lending limitations of such Code section. The assignment of any purchase contract, or the right to purchase real property thereunder, by the lessee or an affiliate thereof to the bank shall not affect the entitlement of any real estate broker to any real estate brokerage commissions owing upon the sale of such real property.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, § 22; Code 1933, § 13-2022; Ga. L. 1966, p. 590, § 8; Code 1933, § 41A-1303, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 4; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 5; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 7; Ga. L. 2004, p. 458, § 3.

7-1-283.
Participations.

A bank may purchase and may sell participations in:

One or more evidences of indebtedness or agreements for the payment of money, subject to regulations by the department; or

Pools of evidences of indebtedness or agreements for the payment of money, subject to regulations by the department.

The department may prohibit the sale of any type of participation to the public or otherwise not in the usual course of banking business, except as permitted by other provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-1304, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-284.
Acceptances.

A bank may accept drafts upon it having not more than nine months’ sight to run arising out of transactions involving:

The import or export of goods;

The domestic shipment of goods, if secured by documents of title covering such goods; or

The storage of readily marketable staples, if secured by documents of title covering such staples.

The aggregate amount of acceptances under subsection (a) of this Code section shall not at any time exceed, for all such acceptances on behalf of one customer, 15 percent of the statutory capital base of the bank, exclusive of any acceptance secured by documents of title or other security growing out of the same transaction as the acceptance.

In addition, a bank may, with the prior approval of the department, accept drafts having not more than three months’ sight to run drawn upon it by banking institutions or bankers in foreign countries or in dependencies or insular possessions of the United States for the purpose of creating dollar exchange as required in an aggregate amount which shall not at any time exceed:

For all such acceptances on behalf of a single banking institution or banker, 10 percent of the statutory capital base;

For all such acceptances, 50 percent of the statutory capital base, provided that the department may, by regulation, impose additional restrictions on the acceptance of drafts under this subsection.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, § 20; Code 1933, § 13-2020; Code 1933, § 41A-1305, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 275, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1366, § 7; Ga. L. 1983, p. 602, § 5.

Cross references.

Effect of proffered acceptance of draft by drawee which varies draft as presented, §

11-3-412

.

Warehouse receipts, bills of lading, and other documents of title, §

11-7-101

et seq.

7-1-285.
Limits on obligations of one person or corporation.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Credit exposure as a counterparty in derivative transactions” means an amount that the bank reasonably determines, pursuant to a methodology acceptable to the department under the terms of the derivative or otherwise, would be its loss if a counterparty were to default on the date of determination, taking into account any netting and collateral arrangements and any guarantees or other credit enhancements; provided, however, that the bank may elect to determine credit exposure on the basis of such other method of determining credit exposure as may be permitted by the department and the bank’s primary federal regulator.

“Derivative transaction” includes any transaction that is an agreement, contract, note, option, swap, or warrant that is based, in whole or in part, on the value of, any interest in, or any quantitative measure or the occurrence of any event relating to, one or more commodities, securities, currencies, interest or other rates, indices, or other assets.

“Person or corporation” includes, but is not limited to, an individual, corporation, partnership, trust, association, joint venture, pool, syndicate, sole proprietorship, or unincorporated organization. The term “person or corporation” shall not include the affiliates of a bank or a clearing organization registered or exempt from registration with the Commodity Futures Trading Commission, the Securities and Exchange Commission, any other federal agency, or any successor agencies.

where the aggregate of such loans, obligations, and credit exposure together exceeds 15 percent of the statutory capital base of the bank at the time of issuance of a binding commitment unless each loan, discount, purchase, or derivative transaction in excess of such 15 percent limit is approved in advance by the board of directors or a committee authorized to act for it subject to the provisions set forth in subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section. Approval by the board of directors or authorized committee shall be recorded in the formal minutes of the actions of the board or its committee by name of borrower, amount of loan, maturity of loan, general type of collateral, and such other information as required pursuant to the rules and regulations of the department. Any action required by this subsection may be taken pursuant to Code Section 7-1-483, provided that the minutes of the proceedings of the board or of the committee reflect such action and each director taking such action signs the minutes reflecting such action by no later than the next regular meeting of the board or committee attended by such director.

(a.1)

A bank shall not at any time:

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, a bank shall not directly or indirectly make loans, have obligations, or have credit exposure as a counterparty in derivative transactions to any one person or corporation which in aggregate exceed 15 percent of the statutory capital base of the bank at the time of issuance of a binding commitment unless the entire amount of such loans, obligations, and credit exposure in derivative transactions is secured by good collateral or other ample security and does not exceed 25 percent of the statutory capital base at the time of issuance of a binding commitment. Except as otherwise indicated in subsection (c) of this Code section, the purchase or discount of agreements for the payment of money or evidences of indebtedness shall be regarded as indirect loans to the person or corporation receiving the proceeds of such transactions. In estimating the legal lending limit for any one person or corporation, loans to related corporations, partnerships, and other entities shall be combined subject to regulations established by the department.

The limitations of subsection (b) of this Code section shall not apply to:

Obligations of and obligations guaranteed by:

The United States;

The State of Georgia or a public body thereof authorized to levy taxes;

Any state of the United States or any public body thereof if the obligations or guarantees are general obligations; or

Any agency of this state as defined in subparagraph (a)(1)(A) of Code Section 50-14-1;

Obligations to the extent secured by:

Obligations specified in paragraph (3) of this subsection;

Obligations which the bank would be authorized to acquire without limit as investment securities pursuant to Code Section 7-1-287;

Obligations fully guaranteed by the United States;

Guaranties or commitments or agreements to take over or purchase made by any public body of the United States or any corporation owned directly or indirectly by the United States; or

Loan agreements between a local public agency or a public housing agency and an instrumentality of the United States pursuant to national housing legislation under which funds will be provided for payment of the obligations secured by such loan agreements;

Obligations in the form of investment securities acquired pursuant to Code Section 7-1-287 and related regulations;

Obligations with respect to the sale of federal or correspondent funds to financial institutions having their deposits insured to the same extent as that required of similar institutions chartered in this state; and

A renewal or restructuring of a loan as a new loan or extension of credit following the exercise by the bank of reasonable efforts, consistent with safe and sound banking practices, to bring the loan into conformance with the lending limits of this Code section, unless:

New funds are advanced by the bank to the borrower, except as permitted under this Code section;

A new borrower replaces the original borrower; or

The department determines that a renewal or restructuring was undertaken as a means to evade the bank’s lending limit.

In lieu of following the limitations contained in subsections (a) through (c) of this Code section and the related regulations of the department, a bank may petition the department for approval to utilize all of the limitations applicable to national banks regarding obligations of a single person or corporation.

The department may, by regulation not inconsistent with this Code section, prescribe definitions of and requirements for transactions included in or excluded from the indebtedness to which this Code section applies. The department may also by regulation prescribe less restrictive limitations than those listed in subsections (a) through (c) of this Code section for banks meeting certain financial and management criteria. In addition, the department may, by regulation or otherwise, specify that the liabilities of a group of one or more persons or corporations or both shall be considered as owed by one person or corporation for the purposes of this Code section because the borrowers within the group are related through common control or the group meets other criteria established by the department for the combination of indebtedness for legal lending limitation purposes.

(1)

Make loans to any one person or corporation;

(2)

Have obligations owing to it from any one person or corporation as a result of purchasing or discounting evidences of indebtedness or agreements for the payment of money; or

(3)

Have credit exposure as a counterparty in derivative transactions with any one person or corporation,

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, § 13; Ga. L. 1922, p. 63, § 1; Ga. L. 1927, p. 195, § 9; Code 1933, § 13-2013; Ga. L. 1943, p. 254, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 201, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 414, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 590, § 7; Ga. L. 1969, p. 603, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 526, § 4; Code 1933, § 41A-1306, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1366, § 8; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 7; Ga. L. 1983, p. 602, § 6; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 7; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 86, § 5/HB 141; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1, § 1/HB 926; Ga. L. 2012, p. 349, § 1/HB 886; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 6/HB 143; Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 5/HB 780.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, deleted “or” at the end of subparagraph (c)(1)(B), added “or” at the end of subparagraph (c)(1)(C), and added subparagraph (c)(1)(D). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Loans and discounts, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Banking and Finance, Banks, Chapter 80-1-5.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on business corporations, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 61 (2012).

7-1-286.
Real estate loans; acquisition by bank or trust company of ownership interest.

A bank shall make loans secured by improved or unimproved real estate (including a leasehold) subject to the provisions of Part 365 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation’s rules and regulations, including 12 C.F.R. 365.1 and 365.2 and the Interagency Guidelines for Real Estate Lending Policies in Appendix A and 12 C.F.R. 208.51 and the guidelines contained in 12 C.F.R. Part 208 in the case of Federal Reserve member banks. Such loans shall also be subject to the additional provisions and exceptions as set forth in the rules of the department.

The limitations of subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to:

An investment security acquired pursuant to Code Section 7-1-287;

A loan in connection with which the bank takes a real estate lien as security in the exercise of banking prudence but as to which it is relying for repayment on:

The general credit of the obligor or of an installment buyer or of a lessee of the real estate;

Collateral other than the real estate lien;

A guaranty or an agreement to take over or purchase the loan, in the event of default, by a financially responsible person other than a person engaged in the business of guaranteeing real estate loans; or

An agreement by a financially responsible person to take over or purchase the loan, or to provide funds for payment thereof, within a period of two years from the date of the loan;

and there is documentation in the file setting forth the applicable facts to support reliance on this paragraph.

For the purpose of this Code section, a “leasehold” shall mean the interest, which is security for a loan, of a lessee of real estate under a lease which on the date of the loan has an unexpired term extending at least ten years beyond the maturity of the loan or contains a right of renewal, which may be exercised by the bank, extending at least ten years beyond the maturity of the loan.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter and otherwise subject to regulations of the department, a bank or trust company may acquire, directly or indirectly, an ownership interest in real estate incidental to the financing of the purchase, development, or improvement of such real estate, provided that:

The amount of such ownership interest shall not exceed 25 percent of the appraised value of the real estate;

The amount of such ownership interest when aggregated with the amount financed shall not exceed the limitations prescribed by this Code section and Code Section 7-1-285;

The ownership interest shall be terminated upon substantial repayment of the financing in the manner prescribed in Code Section 7-1-263, relating to the divestiture of real estate interest; and

Any time real estate owned by a bank or trust company pursuant to this subsection is held or disposed of pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 7-1-263, said action to hold or dispose shall be reported in writing annually to the stockholders. Said report shall include disclosure of any real estate acquired by foreclosure or the taking by a deed in lieu of foreclosure and the name or names of the corporation or individuals from whom title was taken.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, § 15; Code 1933, § 13-2015; Ga. L. 1937, p. 423, § 1; Ga. L. 1945, p. 208, § 1; Ga. L. 1959, p. 250, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 281, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 556, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-1307, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 18; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1249, § 4; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 7; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 14; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 7; Ga. L. 2001, p. 970, § 2; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 2/SB 70; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “provided that:” for “provided:” at the end of the introductory language of subsection (d).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1989, “Any time” was substituted for “Anytime” at the beginning of paragraph (e)(4) (now (d)(4)).

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules governing real estate loans, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Department of Banking and Finance, Rule 80-1-5.02.

Law reviews.

For article, “Business Associations,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 109 (2001).

For note, “Opportunity Costs:
Nonjudicial Foreclosure and the Subprime Mortgage Crisis in Georgia,” see 25 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1205 (2009).

7-1-287.
Dealings in securities; conflicts of interest; divestiture and fines.

Notwithstanding the limitations of Code Section 7-1-288, a bank may purchase, sell, underwrite, and hold securities which are obligations in the form of bonds, notes, or debentures or mutual funds, investment trusts, or pools primarily consisting of such bonds, notes, or debentures, and may purchase, sell, and hold corporate debt obligations, to the extent authorized by regulations of the department. The department may issue regulations which prescribe operating restrictions and standards of conduct dealing with potential conflicts of interest and shall prescribe rules for divestiture of securities held in violation of such regulations and fines for violations not to exceed $10,000.00 per day during which each violation remains uncorrected. A bank may hold without limit securities which are obligations of the United States or obligations which are guaranteed fully as to principal and interest by the United States or general obligations of any state.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, § 23; Ga. L. 1924, p. 76, § 1; Ga. L. 1927, p. 195, § 10; Code 1933, § 13-2023; Ga. L. 1946, p. 65, § 1; Ga. L. 1947, p. 501, § 1; Ga. L. 1950, p. 18, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 284, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 275, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1959, p. 238, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 95, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 523, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1162, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 976, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-1308, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1249, § 5; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 5.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Investment securities, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Department of Banking and Finance, Banks, Chapter 80-1-4.

7-1-288.
Corporate stock and securities.

A bank may engage in any transaction with respect to shares of stock or other capital securities of any corporation in accordance with this Code section and in other instances as provided in state or federal law.

A bank may:

Engage in transactions with respect to issuance and transfer of shares of its own stock and capital securities and in other transactions with respect to such stock and capital securities authorized by this chapter;

Purchase and sell shares of stock, bonds, capital securities, and other investment products upon the order of and for the account of a customer without recourse against it;

Receive a pledge or other security interest in stock or capital securities in order to secure loans made in good faith, except that it may not receive such interests in its own stock or capital securities nor lend in one or more transactions, involving one or more borrowers, more than 30 percent of its statutory capital base on the stock or capital securities of any corporation (including therein loans made directly to the corporation without ample security but excluding obligations representing the sale of federal or correspondent funds to another financial institution). The department may, by regulation or otherwise, specify that two or more corporations are so interrelated that their stock shall be regarded as the stock of one corporation for the purposes of this subsection.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, a bank may acquire and hold for its own account:

Shares of stock of a federal reserve bank without limitation of amount;

Shares of stock or interests in:

Any state or federal government sponsored instrumentality for the guarantee, underwriting, or marketing of residential housing or financing of residential housing;

A business development corporation or small minority business development corporation authorized under Article 6 of this chapter;

An agricultural credit corporation duly organized under the laws of this state having authority to make loans to farmers of this state for agricultural purposes under programs administered by the federal farm credit system;

A bank service corporation created to provide support services for one or more financial institutions;

A bank principally engaged in foreign or international banking or banking in a dependency or insular possession of the United States, either directly or through the agency, ownership, or control of local institutions in foreign countries or in such dependencies or insular possessions, including the stock of one or more corporations existing pursuant to Section 25(a) of the Federal Reserve Act, provided that, before a bank may purchase a majority interest in any such banking institution, it shall enter into an agreement with the department to restrict its operations in such manner as the department may prescribe; and provided, further, that, if the department determines that said restrictions have not been complied with, it may order the disposition of said stock upon reasonable notice.

A bank engaged in providing banking or other financial services to depository financial institutions, which bank’s ownership consists primarily of such depository financial institutions;

A corporation or limited liability company engaged in functions or activities that the bank or trust company is authorized to carry on, including, but not limited to: conducting a safe-deposit business; holding real estate; acting as a financial planner or investment adviser; offering of a full range of investment products; promoting and facilitating international trade and commerce; and exercising powers incidental to financial activities as provided in paragraph (11) of Code Section 7-1-261; in addition to functions or activities which include exercising powers granted by department regulations or exercising powers determined by the commissioner to be financial in nature or incidental to the provision of financial services, so long as these activities do not pose undue risk to the safety and soundness of the financial institution and are consistent with the objectives of this chapter as stated in Code Section 7-1-3; provided, however, unless the bank is exempt, nothing contained in this subparagraph shall relieve any such corporation or limited liability company from undertaking registration, licensing, or other qualification to engage in such functions or activities as may otherwise be required by law; and

Other corporations created pursuant to act of Congress or pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 14, known as the “Georgia Nonprofit Corporation Code,” for the purpose of meeting the agricultural, housing, health, transit, educational, environmental, or similar needs where the department determines that investment therein by banks is in the public interest;

Shares of stock of small business investment companies organized under acts of Congress and doing business in this state, provided that the aggregate investment by the bank in such shares shall not exceed 5 percent of its statutory capital base; and

Shares of stock or partnership interests in a corporation or partnership the primary business of which, as determined by the department, is to promote the public welfare or community development by engaging in the development of low and moderate-income housing, job training and job placement programs, credit counseling, public education regarding financial matters, small business development, and other similar purposes. The ability to invest in such stock or partnership interests shall also be subject to such limitations and approval procedures as the department deems necessary in order to assure that such investments are not a safety and soundness concern.

A bank acquiring stock or an interest in an entity listed in paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Code section shall be subject to the following limitations:

Where the entity carries on only such activities as the bank could legally perform itself, there is no limitation on investment;

Where the activities of the entity go beyond those that the bank could legally perform, the bank’s investment may not exceed 10 percent of its statutory capital base; and

Where the investment is in stock of the Federal Home Loan Bank, there is no limitation on the bank’s investment, provided that such investment is for the purpose of utilizing the services of the Federal Home Loan Bank.

Prior approval by the department is required for acquisitions listed in subparagraphs (c)(2)(D) through (c)(2)(G) of this Code section. The department, by regulation, may permit expedited or notice only procedures and may provide for applicable administrative fees.

The department may by rule or regulation prescribe less restrictive investment limitations than those contained in this Code section for banks meeting certain financial and management criteria.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, §§ 20, 23; Ga. L. 1924, p. 76, § 1; Ga. L. 1927, p. 195, § 10; Code 1933, §§ 13-2017, 13-2023; Ga. L. 1946, p. 65, § 1; Ga. L. 1947, p. 501, § 1; Ga. L. 1950, p. 18, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 284, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 328, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 275, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1959, p. 238, § 1; Ga. L. 1959, p. 328, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 95, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 523, § 1; Code 1933, § 13-2023.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1968, p. 1042, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1162, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 976, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 798, § 6; Code 1933, § 41A-1309, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 19; Ga. L. 1977, p. 730, § 3; Ga. L. 1979, p. 953, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 602, § 7; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 7; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1586, § 4; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1249, § 6; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 13; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 7; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 7; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 12; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 6; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 8; Ga. L. 2001, p. 970, § 3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1220, § 5; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 7/SB 82; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “provided that such investment” for “provided such investment” in the middle of paragraph (d)(3).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2001, “subparagraphs (c)(2)(D) through (c)(2)(G)” was substituted for “subparagraphs (D) through (G)” in subsection (e).

U.S. Code.

Section 25(a) of the Federal Reserve Act, referred to in subsection (c)(2)(E)(i) of this Code section, is codified as

12 U.S.C. § 611

et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Investment securities, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Banking and Finance, Banks, Chapter 80-1-4.

Law reviews.

For article, “Business Associations,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 109 (2001).

7-1-289.
Security for deposits.

A bank may pledge or otherwise grant security interests in its assets to secure deposits of:

Public funds;

Funds of a pension fund for employees of a public body of the state;

Funds for which a public body of the state or an officer or employee thereof or any court of law is the custodian or trustee pursuant to statute;

Funds held by the department as receiver;

Funds which are required to be secured by law or by an order of a court;

Its own fiduciary funds or the fiduciary funds of an affiliate. In either case, the funds shall be deposited with the pledging institution and held in its commercial department; and

Public funds deposited in another bank.

Except for the deposits listed in subsection (a) of this Code section, a bank may not pledge or otherwise grant security interests in its assets as security for deposits unless otherwise specifically approved in writing by the department.

History.

Code 1933, § 13-2068, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 526, § 8; Code 1933, § 41A-1310, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 929, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 14; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-6/HB 811.

7-1-290.
Powers as surety or guarantor.

Except as authorized in subsection (b) of this Code section, in paragraph (10) of Code Section 7-1-260, and in paragraph (4) of Code Section 7-1-261, a bank shall not lend its credit, bind itself as a surety to indemnify another, or otherwise become a guarantor.

A bank may act as a surety or guarantor if it has a substantial interest in the performance of the transaction involved or has a segregated deposit sufficient in amount to cover the institution’s potential liability.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to prohibit banks from:

Giving warranties or guaranties in connection with the handling of items for collection; the transfer, exchange, or collection of securities; or the sale or disposition of its assets;

Issuing letters of credit; and

Pledging or otherwise granting security interests in their assets to secure public funds deposited in the bank or another bank, including, but not limited to, deposits made pursuant to a pledging pool.

Notwithstanding other provisions of law to the contrary, irrevocable letters of credit issued by banks domiciled in this state may, in the discretion of the party in whose favor such irrevocable letter of credit is issued, be accepted in lieu of any bond, surety, or pledge of assets required by the laws of this state or regulations promulgated pursuant to such laws.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-1311, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 602, § 8; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1211, § 5; Ga. L. 1993, p. 929, § 2; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 2-3/HB 811.

7-1-291.
Borrowings; liabilities not subject to restrictions; restrictions; borrowing for emergencies.

Subject to the restrictions of subsection (c) of this Code section, a bank may borrow money and issue notes, debentures, or other obligations to evidence such borrowings.

The following outstanding liabilities are not subject to the restrictions in this Code section:

Liabilities to a federal reserve bank on account of money borrowed or rediscounts;

Liabilities on account of the acquisition of reserve balances at a federal reserve bank or other reserve agent from a member or a nonmember bank;

Liabilities on account of agreements to repurchase securities sold by the bank (commonly known as “repurchase agreements”);

Liabilities in the form of subordinated securities under Code Section 7-1-419; and

Liabilities which do not constitute or result from the borrowing of money under definitions prescribed by regulation of the department.

A bank that wishes to borrow from sources other than those listed in subsection (b) of this Code section may borrow an aggregate amount which exceeds the sum of twice its unimpaired capital stock plus 100 percent of its unimpaired paid-in capital and retained earnings, provided that the bank’s board of directors has approved a comprehensive written funding plan that addresses the following safety and soundness concerns:

The plan must contain a detailed evaluation of the bank’s management expertise and information systems to support the plan; and

The plan must contain adequate asset and liability, liquidity, and funds management policies and procedures to specifically address the use of borrowings as an alternate funding source.

The department may, notwithstanding the other provisions of this Code section, temporarily waive the requirements of this Code section to permit an individual bank to borrow for emergency purposes. The department shall review the funding plan of each bank as a part of its normal supervisory program. The department may prohibit or place additional restrictions upon borrowings of any bank which would, in the judgment of the department, constitute an unsafe or unsound practice in view of the condition and circumstances of the bank.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, § 25; Code 1933, § 13-2025; Ga. L. 1966, p. 590, § 9; Ga. L. 1973, p. 526, § 5; Code 1933, § 41A-1312, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 20; Ga. L. 1996, p. 848, § 5; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 5/HB 185; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language of subsection (c), deleted “appropriated retained earnings,” following “paid-in capital,” and inserted “that” following “provided” in the middle.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in subsection (c).

Administrative rules and regulations.

Borrowed money, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Department of Banking and Finance, Chapter 80-1-9.

7-1-292.
Interest and fees.

Any bank may take, receive, reserve, and charge interest and fees on any loan, advance of money, or forbearance to enforce the collection of money at rates not exceeding the limits set by the laws of this state. Whenever such laws authorize a special interest or fee rate with respect to a designated type of loan, then a bank may charge that special interest or fee on loans of that type made by it. Whenever such laws authorize a person or a corporation other than a bank to charge a special interest or fee rate with respect to a designated type of loan, then a bank may charge such rate or fee on loans made by it which would qualify as the designated type of loan if made by the person or corporation so authorized without any requirement for the bank to obtain any license, qualification, or permit.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, § 19; Code 1933, § 13-2019; Code 1933, § 41A-1313, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

Cross references.

Regulation of rates of interest generally, T. 7, C. 4.

Law reviews.

For article surveying Georgia cases dealing with commercial law from June 1977 through May 1978, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 15 (1978).

For article discussing methods of computation of finance charges in Georgia consumer credit contracts, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (1978).

For survey article on commercial law, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 31 (1982).